District of Columbia statutes.
3-1208.01

Licensed social work associate.

(a)

The Board of Social Work shall license as a social work associate a person who, in addition to meeting the requirements of subchapter V of this chapter, has a baccalaureate degree (“B.S.W.”) from a social work program accredited by the Council of Social Work Education, and has satisfactorily completed the examination process at the associate level.

(b)

A licensed social work associate (“L.S.W.A.”) may perform case work, group work, and community organization services under the supervision of a social worker licensed under § 3-1208.03 or § 3-1208.04.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 801, 33 DCR 729

History

1981 Ed., § 2-3308.1.

Prior Codifications